Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5793YC (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 103.10, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. An applicant who can provide proof acceptable to the 3 board that the applicant has been working in the electrical 4 business and involved in planning for, laying out, supervising, 5 and installing electrical wiring, apparatus, or equipment for 6 light, heat, and power since January 1, 1998, and for a total 7 of at least sixteen thousand hours in any state , of which at 8 least eight thousand hours shall have been accumulated since 9 January 1, 1998, may be granted a class B master electrician 10 license without taking an examination. An applicant who is 11 issued a class B master electrician license pursuant to this 12 section shall not be authorized to plan, lay out, or supervise 13 the installation of electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment 14 in a political subdivision which, prior to or after January 1, 15 2008, establishes licensing standards which preclude such work 16 by class B master electricians in the political subdivision. 17 The board shall adopt rules establishing procedures relating 18 to the restriction of a class B master electrician license 19 pursuant to this subsection . 20